Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-1007
Flood, defined.

Flood shall mean the water of any watercourse or drainway which is above the bank or outside the channel and banks of such watercourse or drainway.

Laws 1983, LB 35, § 7.